Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 215.441 is amended to read:
215.441. (1) If a church,  synagogue, temple, mosque, chapel, meeting house or other nonresiden-
tial place of worship is  allowed on real property under state law and rules and local zoning ordi-
nances and regulations, a county shall allow  the reasonable use of the real property for activities
customarily associated with the practices of the religious activity, including:
(a) Worship services.
(b) Religion classes.
(c) Weddings.
(d) Funerals.
(e) Meal programs.
(f) Child care  or  any preschool or prekindergarten education , but not [ including] private or
parochial [ school] education for [ prekindergarten] kindergarten through  grade 12 or higher educa-
tion.
(2) A county may:
(a) Subject real property described in subsection (1)  of this section to reasonable regulations,
including site review or design review, concerning  the physical characteristics of the uses author-
ized under subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Prohibit or  restrict the use of real property by a place of worship described in subsection
(1) of this  section if the county finds that the level of service of public facilities, including trans-
portation,  water  supply, sewer and storm drain systems is not adequate to serve the place of worship
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a county may allow a private or  paro-
chial school for [ prekindergarten] kindergarten  through grade 12  or higher education to be sited
under applicable state law and rules and local zoning ordinances and regulations.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 227.500 is amended to read:
227.500. (1) If a church, synagogue, temple, mosque, chapel, meeting  house or other nonresiden-
tial place of worship is allowed on real property under state law and rules  and local zoning ordi-
nances and regulations, a city shall allow the reasonable use of the  real property for activities
customarily associated with the practices of the religious activity, including:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1099 (SB 1099-A) Page 1
(a) Worship services.
(b) Religion classes.
(c) Weddings.
(d) Funerals.
(e) Meal programs.
(f) Child care  or any preschool or prekindergarten education , but not  [ including] private or
parochial [ school] education for [ prekindergarten] kindergarten through grade 12 or higher educa-
tion.
(2) A city may:
(a) Subject real property described in subsection  (1) of this section to reasonable regulations,
including site review and design review, concerning  the physical characteristics of the uses au-
thorized under subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) Prohibit or  regulate the use of real property by a place of worship described in subsection
(1) of this section if the city finds that the level of service of public facilities,  including transporta-
tion, water supply, sewer and storm drain systems is not adequate to serve the place  of worship
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a city may allow  a private or parochial
school for [ prekindergarten] kindergarten through grade  12 or higher education to be sited under
applicable state law and rules and local zoning ordinances and regulations.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 9, 2025
Repassed by Senate May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1099 (SB 1099-A) Page 2